en: Pork 80/20 trimming
fr: Porc maigre 80/20

en: Pork shoulder upper half without rind fat and bone
fr: palette de porc

en: Devilled pork shoulder in mustard sauce
fr: Palette à la diable, Palette de porc à la diable

en: Pork tongue
fr: Langue de porc
hr: Svinjski jezik
ja: 豚タン
nl: Varkenstong
zh: 猪舌, 口条

en: Pig heart, Pork heart
fr: Cœur de porc, Coeur de porc
hr: Svinjsko srce
hu: Disznó szív
it: Cuore di maiale
ja: 豚ハツ
zh: 猪心

en: Pork kidney
fr: Rognons de porc, Rognons de porc crus

en: Cooked pork kidneys
fr: Rognons de porc cuits

en: Dromedary, Dromedary meat
de: Dromedar, Dromedar-Fleisch
fr: Dromadaire, Viande de dromadaire
hr: Dromedar
nl: Dromedaris, Dromedarisvlezen

en: Kangaroo, Kangaroo meat
fr: Kangourou, Viande de kangourou

en: Kangaroo offals
fr: Abats de kangourou

en: Frozen kangaroo offals
fr: Abats de kangourou surgelés

en: Kangaroo fillets
fr: Filets de kangourou

en: Frozen kangaroo fillets
fr: Filets de kangourou surgelés

en: Kangaroo chops
fr: Côtes de kangourou

en: Frozen kangaroo chops
fr: Côtes de kangourou surgelées

en: Kangaroo shank
fr: Jarret de kangourou

en: Frozen kangaroo shank
fr: Jarret de kangourou surgelé

en: Kangaroo leg
fr: Cuisse de kangourou

en: Frozen kangaroo leg
fr: Cuisse de kangourou surgelée

en: Frozen kangaroo meat
fr: Viande de kangourou surgelée